lexicon/apertium-krc.Cyrl-Seegmiller.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%> 

%{ö%}
%{ü%}
%{c%}
%{ş%}
%{ç%}
%{q%}
%{ğ%}
%{ŋ%}
%{İ%}
%{й%}
%{☭%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
! Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

б:б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
в:в AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
г:г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
д:д AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ж:ж AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
з:з AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
й:й AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
к:к AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
л:л AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
м:м AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
н:н AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
п:п AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
р:р AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
с:с AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
т:т AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ф:ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
х:х AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ч:ч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ш:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
!щ:щ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ъ:ъ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ь:ь AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ы:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
и:и AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

у:у AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
а:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
э:э AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
о:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ц:тс AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
щ:шч AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ю:йу AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
я:йа AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
е:йе AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ё:йо AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

ю:%{ü%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ё:%{ö%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ю:й%{ü%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
ё:й%{ö%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 

дж:%{c%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
къ:%{q%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
гъ:%{ğ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
нг:%{ŋ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

И:%{İ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ; 

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
